Maine, session 132, LD509.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §1202-B, sub-§4, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 327, §2, is
amended to read:
A. A journeyman electrician may make electrical installations while employed by a
supervising master electrician, limited electrician or electrical company. A person
licensed under this subsection may supervise:
(1) Two helper electricians who are enrolled in, or have completed, a 576-hour
course of study as adopted by the board;
(2) Two apprentice electricians; or
(3) One Three helper electrician electricians.